Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Child Care

199.892.
Declaration of legislative intent.

In enacting legislation relating to the regulation of day-care centers, it is the intention of the General Assembly to enable the Cabinet for Health and Family Services to qualify to receive federal funds under provisions of the Federal Social Security Act and to provide for effective regulation of day-care centers.

History.
Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 196, § 1; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(1), (13); 1998, ch. 426, § 155, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 192, effective June 20, 2005.

199.894.
Definitions for KRS 199.892 to 199.896.

As used in KRS 199.892 to 199.896, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Cabinet” means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

“Secretary” means secretary for health and family services;

“Child-care center” means any child-care center that provides full-or part-time care, day or night, to four (4) or more children in a nonresidential setting who are not the children, grandchildren, nieces, nephews, or children in legal custody of the operator. “Child-care center” shall not include any child-care facility operated by a religious organization while religious services are being conducted, or a youth development agency. For the purposes of this section, “youth development agency” means a program with tax-exempt status under 26 U.S.C. sec. 501(c)(3), which operates continuously throughout the year as an outside-school-hours center for youth who are six (6) years of age or older, and for which there are no fee or scheduled-care arrangements with the parent or guardian of the youth served;

“Department” means the Department for Community Based Services; and

“Family child-care home” means a private home that is the primary residence of an individual who provides full or part-time care day or night for six (6) or fewer children who are not the children, siblings, stepchildren, grandchildren, nieces, nephews, or children in legal custody of the provider.

History.
Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 196, § 2; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(1), (13), (21) and (30); 1992, ch. 57, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 81, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 426, § 156, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 308, § 17, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 193, effective June 20, 2005; 2020 ch. 36, § 10, effective July 15, 2020.

199.8941.
Monetary incentives for child-care facilities — Professional development.

To the extent that funds are available, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, in consultation with the Early Childhood Advisory Council, shall, by administrative regulation promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A, establish a program of monetary incentives including but not limited to an increased child-care subsidy and a one-time merit achievement award for child-care centers and certified family child-care homes that are tied to a quality rating system for child care as established under KRS 199.8943.

The monetary incentive program shall be reviewed annually by the cabinet, in consultation with the council, for the purpose of determining future opportunities to provide incentives.

Participation in the program of monetary incentives and in the quality rating system by public-funded child-care centers and certified family child-care homes is mandatory.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall encourage the professional development of persons who are employed or provide training in a child-care or early childhood setting by facilitating their participation in the scholarship program for obtaining a child development associate credential, postsecondary certificate, diploma, degree, or specialty credential as established under KRS 164.518.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 308, § 14, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 194, effective June 20, 2005; 2013, ch. 57, § 3, effective June 25, 2013; 2015 ch. 16, § 2, effective June 24, 2015; 2018 ch. 112, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.

199.8943.
Quality-based graduated early care and education program rating system — Administrative regulations.

As used in this section:

“Federally funded time-limited employee” has the same meaning as in KRS 18A.005;

“Primary school program” has the same meaning as in KRS 158.031(1); and

“Public-funded” means a program which receives local, state, or federal funding.

The Early Childhood Advisory Council shall, in consultation with early care and education providers, the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, and others, including but not limited to child-care resource and referral agencies and family resource centers, Head Start agencies, and the Kentucky Department of Education, develop a quality-based graduated early care and education program rating system for public-funded licensed child-care and certified family child-care homes, public-funded preschool, and Head Start, based on but not limited to:

Classroom and instructional quality;

Administrative and leadership practices;

Staff qualifications and professional development; and

Family and community engagement.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall, in consultation with the Early Childhood Advisory Council, promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement the quality-based graduated early childhood rating system for public-funded child-care and certified family child-care homes developed under subsection (2) of this section.
(3) (a)

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall, in consultation with the Early Childhood Advisory Council, promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement the quality-based graduated early childhood rating system for public-funded child-care and certified family child-care homes developed under subsection (2) of this section.

The Kentucky Department of Education shall, in consultation with the Early Childhood Advisory Council, promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement the quality-based graduated early childhood rating system, developed under subsection (2) of this section, for public-funded preschool.

The administrative regulations promulgated in accordance with paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection shall include:

Agency time frames of reviews for rating;

An appellate process under KRS Chapter 13B; and

The ability of providers to request reevaluation for rating.

The quality-based early childhood rating system shall not be used for enforcement of compliance or in any punitive manner.

The Early Childhood Advisory Council, in consultation with the Kentucky Center for Education and Workforce Statistics, the Kentucky Department of Education, and the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, shall report by October 1 of each year to the Interim Joint Committee on Education and the Child Welfare Oversight and Advisory Committee established in KRS 6.943 on the implementation of the quality-based graduated early childhood rating system. The report shall include the following quantitative performance measures as data becomes available:

Program participation in the rating system;

Ratings of programs by program type;

Changes in student school-readiness measures;

Longitudinal student cohort performance data tracked through student completion of the primary school program; and

Long-term viability recommendations for sustainability at the end of the Race to the Top-Early Learning Challenge grant.

By November 1, 2017, the Early Childhood Advisory Council and the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall report to the Interim Joint Committee on Education and the Interim Joint Committee on Health and Welfare on recommendations and plans for sustaining program quality after the depletion of federal Race to the Top-Early Learning Challenge grant funds.

Any federally funded time-limited employee personnel positions created as a result of the federal Race to the Top-Early Learning Challenge grant shall be eliminated upon depletion of the grant funds.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 308, § 15, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 195, effective June 20, 2005; 2013, ch. 57, § 4, effective June 25, 2013; 2015 ch. 16, § 1, effective June 24, 2015; 2018 ch. 112, § 3, effective July 14, 2018; 2018 ch. 159, § 52, § 52, effective July 14, 2018.

199.8945.
Healthy Start in Child Care Program — Technical assistance for child-care providers.

The secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall work to achieve the goals of the Healthy Start in Child Care Program as follows:

To train and educate child-care providers in health and safety;

Provide nutrition consultation to parents;

Increase awareness of methods for the prevention of communicable diseases in child-care settings; and

Provide information to parents of children who attend child care.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall establish technical assistance positions dedicated to child care within the Kentucky child-care resource and referral agencies in order to offer technical assistance to child-care providers to upgrade quality in early child-care and education facilities.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 308, § 16, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 47, effective June 20, 2005.

199.895.
Evacuation plan required for child-care centers and family child-care homes — Annual updating of plan — Provision of plan to local emergency
management officials and parents.

A child-care center licensed under KRS 199.896 and a family child-care home certified under KRS 199.8982 shall have a written plan for evacuation in the event of fire, natural disaster, or other threatening situation that may pose a health or safety hazard to the children in the center or home. The plan shall include but not be limited to:

A designated relocation site and evacuation route;

Procedures for notifying parents of the relocation and ensuring family reunification;

Procedures to address the needs of individual children including children with special needs;

Instructions relating to the training of staff or the reassignment of staff duties, as appropriate;

Coordination with local emergency management officials; and

A program to ensure that appropriate staff are familiar with the plan’s components.

A child-care center and a family child-care home shall update the evacuation plan by December 31 each year.

A child-care center and a family child-care home shall retain an updated copy of the plan for evacuation, provide an updated copy to appropriate local emergency management officials, and provide a copy to each parent, custodian, or guardian of the child at the time of the child’s enrollment in the program and whenever the plan is updated.

History.
Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 69, § 3, effective December 31, 2011; 2012, ch. 102, § 1, effective July 12, 2012.

199.8951.
Use of epinephrine auto-injectors in child-care centers and family child-care homes — Administrative regulations.

A child-care center licensed under KRS 199.896 and a family child-care home certified under KRS 199.8982 may comply with KRS 311.646 and obtain a prescription for epinephrine auto-injectors. These epinephrine auto-injectors shall be stored in a secure, accessible, readily available location not accessible to children, for quick administration.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations governing epinephrine auto-injectors in licensed child-care centers and certified family child-care homes, including:

Any center- or home-specific requirements that the cabinet deems necessary for the safe and proper storage, administration, and disposal of epinephrine auto-injectors;

A written plan of action in case of an emergency necessitating the administration of an epinephrine auto-injector in a center or home; and

A written notice that is provided to a child’s parents, custodians, or guardians stating that the center or home has epinephrine auto-injectors at the center or home and that the center or home will notify a child’s parents, custodians, or guardians when a epinephrine auto-injector is used on their child.

HISTORY:
2016 ch. 122, § 1, effective July 15, 2016.

199.896.
License requirement — Application — Fee — Emergency action — Use of information — Hearing — Disposition of receipts — Advertisement — Unannounced inspections — Orientation and training requirements — Prohibition against use of corporal physical discipline — Partial and full exemption from regulation — Criminal record check — Probationary employment status — Cabinet’s powers during state of emergency.

No person, association, or organization shall conduct, operate, maintain, or advertise any child-care center without obtaining a license as provided in KRS 199.892 to 199.896.

The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A relating to license fees and may, in the administrative regulations, establish standards of care and service for a child-care center, criteria for the denial of a license if criminal records indicate convictions that may impact the safety and security of children in care, and procedures for enforcement of penalties which are not in contravention of this section.

Each initial application for a license shall be made to the cabinet and shall be accompanied by a fee that shall not exceed administrative costs of the program to the cabinet and shall be renewable annually upon expiration and reapplication when accompanied by a renewal fee that shall not exceed administrative costs of the program to the cabinet. Regular licenses and renewals thereof shall expire one (1) year from their effective date.

No child-care center shall be refused a license or have its license revoked for failure to meet standards set by the secretary until after the expiration of a period not to exceed six (6) months from the date of the first official notice that the standards have not been met. If, however, the cabinet has probable cause to believe that an immediate threat to the public health, safety, or welfare exists, the cabinet may take emergency action pursuant to KRS 13B.125. All administrative hearings conducted under authority of KRS 199.892 to 199.896 shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

If, upon inspection or investigation, the inspector general finds that a child-care center licensed under this section has violated the administrative regulations, standards, or requirements of the cabinet, the inspector general shall issue a statement of deficiency to the center containing:

A statement of fact;

A statement of how an administrative regulation, standard, or requirement of the cabinet was violated; and

The timeframe, negotiated with the child-care center, within which a violation is to be corrected, except that a violation that poses an immediate threat to the health, safety, or welfare of children in the center shall be corrected in no event later than five (5) working days from the date of the statement of deficiency.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services, in consultation with the Office of the Inspector General, shall establish by administrative regulations promulgated in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A an informal dispute resolution process through which a child-care provider may dispute licensure deficiencies that have an adverse effect on the child-care provider’s license.

A child-care center shall have the right to appeal to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services under KRS Chapter 13B any action adverse to its license or the assessment of a civil penalty issued by the inspector general as the result of a violation contained in a statement of deficiency within twenty (20) days of the issuance of the action or assessment of the civil penalty. An appeal shall not act to stay the correction of a violation.

In assessing the civil penalty to be levied against a child-care center for a violation contained in a statement of deficiency issued under this section, the inspector general or the inspector general’s designee shall take into consideration the following factors:

The gravity of the threat to the health, safety, or welfare of children posed by the violation;

The number and type of previous violations of the child-care center;

The reasonable diligence exercised by the child-care center and efforts to correct the violation; and

The amount of assessment necessary to assure immediate and continued compliance.

Upon a child-care center’s failure to take action to correct a violation of the administrative regulations, standards, or requirements of the cabinet contained in a statement of deficiency, or at any time when the operation of a child-care center poses an immediate threat to the health, safety, or welfare of children in the center, and the child-care center continues to operate after the cabinet has taken emergency action to deny, suspend, or revoke its license, the cabinet or the cabinet’s designee shall take at least one (1) of the following actions against the center:

Institute proceedings to obtain an order compelling compliance with the administrative regulations, standards, and requirements of the cabinet;

Institute injunctive proceedings in Circuit Court to terminate the operation of the center;

Institute action to discontinue payment of child-care subsidies; or

Suspend or revoke the license or impose other penalties provided by law.

Upon request of any person, the cabinet shall provide information regarding the denial, revocation, suspension, or violation of any type of child-care center license of the operator. Identifying information regarding children and their families shall remain confidential.

The cabinet shall provide, upon request, public information regarding the inspections of and the plans of correction for the child-care center within the past year. All information distributed by the cabinet under this subsection shall include a statement indicating that the reports as provided under this subsection from the past five (5) years are available from the child-care center upon the parent’s, custodian’s, guardian’s, or other interested person’s request.

All fees collected under the provisions of KRS 199.892 to 199.896 for license and certification applications shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to a special fund for the purpose of administering KRS 199.892 to 199.896 including the payment of expenses of and to the participants in child-care workshops. The funds collected are hereby appropriated for the use of the cabinet. The balance of the special fund shall lapse to the general fund at the end of each biennium.

Any advertisement for child-care services shall include the address of where the service is being provided.

All inspections of licensed and unlicensed child-care centers by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall be unannounced.

All employees and owners of a child-care center who provide care to children shall demonstrate within the first three (3) months of employment completion of at least a total of six (6) hours of orientation in the following areas:

Basic health, safety, and sanitation;

Recognizing and reporting child abuse; and

Developmentally appropriate child-care practice.

All employees and owners of a child-care center who provide care to children shall annually demonstrate to the department completion of at least six (6) hours of training in child development. These hours shall include but are not limited to one and one-half (1.5) hours one (1) time every five (5) years of continuing education in the recognition and prevention of pediatric abusive head trauma, as defined in KRS 620.020. Training in recognizing pediatric abusive head trauma may be designed in collaboration with organizations and agencies that specialize in the prevention and recognition of pediatric head trauma approved by the secretary of the Cabinet for Health and Family Services The one and one-half (1.5) hours required under this section shall be included in the current number of required continuing education hours.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall make available either through the development or approval of a model training curriculum and training materials, including video instructional materials, to cover the areas specified in subsection (15) of this section. The cabinet shall develop or approve the model training curriculum and training materials to cover the areas specified in subsection (15) of this section.

Child-care centers licensed pursuant to this section and family child-care homes certified pursuant to KRS 199.8982 shall not use corporal physical discipline, including the use of spanking, shaking, or paddling, as a means of punishment, discipline, behavior modification, or for any other reason. For the purposes of this section, “corporal physical discipline” means the deliberate infliction of physical pain and does not include spontaneous physical contact that is intended to protect a child from immediate danger.

Child-care centers that provide instructional and educational programs for preschool-aged children that operate for a maximum of twenty (20) hours per week and that a child attends for no more than fifteen (15) hours per week shall:

Notify the cabinet in writing that the center is operating;

Meet all child-care center licensure requirements and administrative regulations related to employee background checks;

Meet all child-care center licensure requirements and administrative regulations related to tuberculosis screenings; and

Be exempt from all other child-care center licensure requirements and administrative regulations.

Child-care centers that provide instructional and educational programs for preschool-aged children that operate for a maximum of twenty (20) hours per week and that a child attends for no more than ten (10) hours per week shall be exempt from all child-care licensure requirements and administrative regulations.

Instructional programs for school-age children shall be exempt from all child-care licensure administrative regulations if the following criteria are met:

The program provides direct instruction in a single skill, talent, ability, expertise, or proficiency;

The program does not provide services or offerings that are not directly related to the single talent, ability, expertise, or proficiency;

The program operates outside the time period when school is in session, including before or after school hours, holidays, school breaks, teaching planning days, or summer vacation;

The program does not advertise or otherwise represent that the program is a licensed child-care center or that the program offers child-care services;

The program informs the parent or guardian:

That the program is not licensed by the cabinet; and

About the physical risks a child may face while participating in the program; and

The program conducts the following background checks for all program employees and volunteers who work with children:

Check of the child abuse and neglect records maintained by the cabinet; and

In-state criminal background information check from the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet or Administrative Office of the Courts.

Directors and employees of child-care centers in a position that involves supervisory or disciplinary power over a minor, or direct contact with a minor, shall submit to a criminal record check in accordance with KRS 199.8965.

A director or employee of a child-care center may be employed on a probationary status pending receipt of the criminal background check. Application for the criminal record of a probationary employee shall be made no later than the date probationary employment begins.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations to identify emergency care providers who provide essential child-care services during an identified state of emergency.

Notwithstanding any state law, administrative regulation, executive order, or executive directive to the contrary, during the 2020 or 2021 state of emergency declared by the Governor in response to COVID-19, including but not limited to any mutated strain of the COVID-19 virus, the cabinet shall not establish any restrictions on capacity for class or group size or the ability to combine classes and groups for capacity limits in the morning or afternoon that is below the number that was in effect on February 1, 2020.

History.
Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 196, § 3; 1974, ch. 74, Art. VI, § 107(21); 1978, ch. 203, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 188, § 187, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 247, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 57, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 131, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 318, § 90, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 426, § 157, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 524, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 308, § 18, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 48, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 171, § 7, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 16, § 3, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 135, § 5, effective March 27, 2017; 2018 ch. 136, § 5, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 36, § 11, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 172, § 1, effective March 30, 2021.

199.8962.
Required standards for child-care centers licensed under KRS 199.896 — Administrative regulations.

Child-care centers licensed pursuant to KRS 199.896 shall have the following standards:

Nutrition standards, if the child-care center provides food, that are consistent with the meal and snack patterns of the most recent version of the United States Department of Agriculture’s Food and Nutrition Service standards for the Child and Adult Care Food Program. These nutrition standards do not apply to food that is brought from a child’s home;

Physical activity standards;

Screen time standards; and

Sugary drink standards.

The cabinet shall, within ninety (90) days of July 15, 2020, promulgate administrative regulations, in consultation with the Kentucky Early Childhood Advisory Council established pursuant to KRS 200.700, the Kentucky Child Care Advisory Council established pursuant to KRS 199.8983, and state and national organizations that have expertise in nutrition, physical activity, screen time, and sugary drink standards, to establish the requirements and procedures for the implementation of the standards established in this section.

HISTORY:
2020 ch. 8, § 1, effective July 15, 2020.

199.8965.
Child care staff members must submit to background checks in accordance with federal law and regulations — Administrative regulations.

For the purposes of this section, “child care staff member” has the same meaning as in 42 U.S.C. sec. 9858f and the implementing federal rules.

The cabinet shall require a child care staff member to submit to background checks in accordance with 42 U.S.C. sec. 9858f and the implementing federal rules, including national and state fingerprint-supported criminal background checks by the Department of Kentucky State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

The child care staff member shall provide the member’s fingerprints to the Department of Kentucky State Police for submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation after a state criminal background check is conducted.

The results of the national and state criminal background checks shall be sent to the cabinet.

The cabinet may register a child care staff member in the rap back system.

The request for background checks shall be in a manner approved by the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, and the cabinet may charge a fee to be paid by a child care staff member for the actual cost of processing the request.

Any fee charged by the Department of Kentucky State Police or the Federal Bureau of Investigation shall be an amount no greater than the actual cost of processing the request and conducting the criminal background check and rap back system ongoing status notification.

The cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to implement this section.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 135, § 4, effective March 27, 2017.

199.8966.
Staff members of child-caring facilities must submit to background checks in accordance with federal law and regulations — Administrative regulations. [Renumbered]

HISTORY:
2019 ch. 33, § 1, effective March 19, 2019; renumbered to § 199.642 by 2020 ch. 53, § 4, effective July 15, 2020.

199.897.
Notification concerning Kentucky Consumer Product Safety Program.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall notify licensed child-care centers and certified family child-care homes on an ongoing basis, including during the license or certification application process and any monitoring visits, of the Kentucky Consumer Product Safety Program and the program’s Web site. Licensed child-care centers shall post in a prominent location a notice of the existence of the Consumer Product Safety Program and the program’s Web site.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services may promulgate administrative regulations to carry out this section.

This section may be cited as The Child Safety Act of 2009.

History.
Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 51, § 1, effective June 25, 2009.

199.898.
Rights for children in child-care programs and their parents, custodians, or guardians — Posting and distribution requirements.

All children receiving child-care services in a day-care center licensed pursuant to KRS 199.896, a family child-care home certified pursuant to KRS 199.8982, or from a provider or program receiving public funds shall have the following rights:

The right to be free from physical or mental abuse;

The right not to be subjected to abusive language or abusive punishment; and

The right to be in the care of adults who shall meet their health, safety, and developmental needs.

Parents, custodians, or guardians of children specified in subsection (1) of this section shall have the following rights:

The right to have access to their children at all times the child is in care and access to the provider caring for their children during normal hours of provider operation and whenever the children are in the care of the provider;

The right to be provided with information about child-care regulatory standards, if applicable; where to direct questions about regulatory standards; and how to file a complaint;

The right to file a complaint against a child-care provider without any retribution against the parent, custodian, guardian, or child;

The right to obtain information from the cabinet regarding any type of licensure denial, suspension, or revocation of an operator, and cabinet reports that have found abuse or neglect by any child-care provider or any employee of a child care provider. Identifying information regarding children and their families shall remain confidential;

The right to obtain information from the cabinet regarding the inspections and plans of correction of the day-care center, the family child-care home, or the provider or program receiving public funds within the past year; and

The right to review and discuss with the provider any state reports and deficiencies revealed by such reports.

The child-care provider who is licensed pursuant to KRS 199.896 or certified pursuant to KRS 199.8982 shall post these rights in a prominent place and shall provide a copy of these rights to the parent, custodian, or guardian of the child at the time of the child’s enrollment in the program.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 57, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1998, ch. 524, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.